Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.210

Hearing prior to judicial review—No bond required.

No bond of any kind shall be required of a claimant appealing to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a finding of the retirement board affecting such claimant's right to retirement or disability benefits.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 21.]